Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1929
License; revoked, suspended; surrendered; when.

Upon the revocation or suspension of any license, the licensee shall surrender the license to the secretary within thirty days after notification of such revocation or suspension. If the licensee fails to do so, the secretary may seize the license.

Laws 1980, LB 485, § 29.